Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-160] Advisory committee. (a)
The commissioner may establish an advisory committee, which shall be composed
of nine members appointed by the commissioner of which:

(1) Eight members shall be practicing licensees with
active licenses; and

(2) One member shall be from the insurance division.

Members shall serve staggered terms of two years
each so that the terms of no more than five members expire each year.

(b) The advisory committee shall assist the
commissioner by:

(1) Recommending to the commissioner policies,
procedures, and administrative rules to implement this part, including:

(A) Additional criteria to be used in the
consideration and review of course providers, courses, and course materials;

(B) Additional criteria to be considered in
the approval or rejection of continuing education courses; and

(C) Courses, credit hours, and fees for
applications of renewals for each approved course;

(2) Reviewing the continuing education course
requirements for this State and other states to determine whether the courses
are substantially equivalent and recommending to the commissioner whether to
enter into or maintain reciprocal agreements with other states;

(3) Reviewing and critiquing proposed continuing
education course materials to determine whether the course materials are
appropriate for the purposes of continuing education and whether courses using
these materials would comply with this part; and

(4) Providing such other and further assistance to
the commissioner as the commissioner deems appropriate.

(c) The committee members shall receive no
monetary compensation for services.

(d) The commissioner may grant continuing
education equivalent credit to members of the advisory committee for work
completed pursuant to this section. [L 2003, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next